Washington statutes.
RCW 5.56.050

Person in court required to testify.

A person present in court or before a judicial officer, may be required to testify in the same manner as if he or she were in attendance upon a subpoena issued by such court or officer.

[ 2011 c 336 s 142; Code 1881 s 397; 1877 p 88 s 399; 1869 p 106 s 392; 1854 p 188 s 299; RRS s 1219.]